District of Columbia statutes.
31-3415

Filing requirements for rating information.

(a)

No fees may be used until either a schedule of enrollment fees or methodology for determining enrollment fees dues has been filed with and approved by the Commissioner.

(b)

Either a specific schedule of fees, or a methodology for determining fees, shall be established in accordance with actuarial principles for various categories of enrollees, provided that the enrollment fees applicable to an enrollee shall not be individually determined based on the status of an enrollee’s health. However, the fees shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory. A statement by a qualified actuary or other qualified person acceptable to the Commissioner as to the appropriateness of the use of the methodology, based on reasonable assumptions, shall accompany the filing along with adequate supporting information. A health maintenance organization filing a schedule of enrollment fees or methodology for determining enrollment fees pursuant to this section shall also comply with the Reasonable Health Insurance Ratemaking Reform Act of 2010 [Chapters 30A, 31C, and 33A of this title].

(c)

The Commissioner shall approve the schedule of enrollment fees dues or methodology for determining enrollment fees if the requirements of subsection (b) of this section are met. If the Commissioner disapproves the filing, the Commissioner shall notify the health maintenance organization. In the notice, the Commissioner shall specify the reasons for disapproval. A hearing shall be held within 30 days after a request in writing by the person filing. If the Commissioner does not take action on the schedule or methodology within 30 days of the filing, it shall be deemed approved.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 16, 44 DCR 818
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 502(b), 58 DCR 896
This section is referenced in § 31-3419.
1981 Ed., § 35-4515.
D.C. Law 18-360, in subsec. (b), added the fourth sentence.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Reasonable Health Insurance Premium Increase Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-328, March 18, 2010, 57 DCR 2546).